North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 135-5(b15)(1)a. reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the
member would have attained his 55th birthday; or

The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b15)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable
service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-three hundredths percent (1.73%) of his average final compensation,
multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 60th and before his 65th birthday and prior to his completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, his retirement allowance
shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b15)(2)a. but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident
with or next following his 65th birthday.

c.
If the member’s early service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 60th birthday and after completion of 20 years of creditable service but prior to
the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his early service retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b15)(2)a. but reduced by the sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement
date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 60th birthday, plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month
by which his 60th birthday precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b15)(2)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement;
or

If the member’s creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1994, the service retirement allowance provided by G.S. 135-5(b14)(2)c.

d.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall not receive less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b16)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or After July 1, 1995, but Before July 1, 1997. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) above, on or after July 1, 1995, but before July 1, 1997, a member shall receive the following service retirement
allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion
of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-five hundredths percent (1.75%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable
service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and
prior to the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 135-5(b16)(1)a. reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the
first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 55th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b16)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of creditable service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable
service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and seventy-five hundredths percent (1.75%) of his average final compensation,
multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 60th and before his 65th birthday and prior to his completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, his retirement allowance
shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b16)(2)a. but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident
with or next following his 65th birthday.

c.
If the member’s early service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 60th birthday and after completion of 20 years of creditable service but prior to
the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his early service retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b16)(2)a. but reduced by the sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement
date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 60th birthday, plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month
by which his 60th birthday precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b16)(2)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement;
or

3.
If the member’s creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1994, the service retirement allowance equal to the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years
as computed in G.S. 135-5(b16)(2)b.

d.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall not receive less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b17)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or After July 1, 1997, but Before July 1, 2000. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) above, on or after July 1, 1997, but before July 1, 2000, a member shall receive the following service retirement
allowance.

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion
of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty hundredths percent (1.80%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and
prior to the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 135-5(b17)(1)a, reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the
first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 55th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b17)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of membership service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable
service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty hundredths percent (1.80%) of his average final compensation,
multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 60th birthday and before his 65th birthday and prior to his completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, his retirement
allowance shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b17)(2)a. but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the
month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday.

c.
If the member’s early service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 60th birthday and after completion of 20 years of creditable service but prior to
the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his early service retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b17)(2)a. but reduced by the sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement
date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 60th birthday, plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month
by which his 60th birthday precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b17)(2)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement;
or

3.
If the member’s creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1994, the service retirement allowance equal to the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years
as computed in G.S. 135-5(b17)(2)b.

d.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall not receive less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b18)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or After July 1, 2000, but Before July 1, 2002. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) above, on or after July 1, 2000, but before July 1, 2002, a member shall receive the following service retirement
allowance.

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion
of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty-one hundredths percent (1.81%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable
service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and
prior to the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 135-5(b18)(1)a. reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the
first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 55th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b18)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of membership service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable
service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty-one hundredths percent (1.81%) of his average final compensation,
multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 60th birthday and before his 65th birthday and prior to his completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, his retirement
allowance shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b18)(2)a. but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the
month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday.

c.
If the member’s early service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 60th birthday and after completion of 20 years of creditable service but prior to
the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his early service retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b18)(2)a. but reduced by the sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement
date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 60th birthday, plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month
by which his 60th birthday precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b18)(2)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement;
or

3.
If the member’s creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1994, the service retirement allowance equal to the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years
as computed in G.S. 135-5(b18)(2)b.

d.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall not receive less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b19)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or After July 1, 2002, but Before July 1, 2019. —
Upon retirement from service in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) of this section, on or after July 1, 2002, but before July 1, 2019, a member shall receive the following service
retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 55th birthday, and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the completion
of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty-two hundredths percent (1.82%) of his average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of his creditable
service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer and
prior to the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 135-5(b19)(1)a. reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the
first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 55th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b19)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after his 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of membership service or after the completion of 30 years of creditable
service or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty-two hundredths percent (1.82%) of his average final compensation,
multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after his 60th birthday and before his 65th birthday and prior to his completion of 25 years or more of creditable service, his retirement
allowance shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b19)(2)a. but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement date precedes the first day of the
month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday.

c.
If the member’s early service retirement date occurs on or after his 50th birthday and before his 60th birthday and after completion of 20 years of creditable service but prior to
the completion of 30 years of creditable service, his early service retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of:

1.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b19)(2)a. but reduced by the sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which his retirement
date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 60th birthday, plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month
by which his 60th birthday precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following his 65th birthday; or

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b19)(2)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and his creditable service at retirement;
or

3.
If the member’s creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1994, the service retirement allowance equal to the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years
as computed in G.S. 135-5(b19)(2)b.

d.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall not receive less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

(b20)
Repealed by Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(e), effective July 30, 2014.

(b21)

Service Retirement Allowance of Members Retiring on or After July 1, 2019. —
Upon retirement from service on or after July 1, 2019, in accordance with subsection (a) or (a1) of this section, a member shall receive the following service retirement allowance:

(1)
A member who is a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after the member’s 55th birthday and completion of five years of creditable service as a law enforcement officer, or after the
completion of 30 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty-two hundredths percent (1.82%) of the member’s average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years
of the member’s creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs prior to the member’s 50th birthday and after the completion of 25 years of creditable service with a minimum of 15 years of creditable
service in a law enforcement capacity but before the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of the following amounts:

1.
The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)a. reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the member’s retirement date precedes
the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained age 55.

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and the member’s creditable service at retirement
plus four percent (4%) times the difference between age 50 and the member’s age at retirement.

c.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after the member’s 50th birthday and before the member’s 55th birthday with 15 or more years of creditable service as a law enforcement
officer and prior to the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of the following amounts:

1.
The service retirement allowance payable under G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)a. reduced by one-third of one percent (1/3 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the retirement date precedes the
first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained age 55.

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b21)(1)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and the amount of creditable service at retirement.

(2)
A member who is not a law enforcement officer or an eligible former law enforcement officer shall receive a service retirement allowance computed as follows:

a.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs on or after the member’s 65th birthday upon the completion of five years of membership service, or after the completion of 30 years of
creditable service, or on or after his 60th birthday upon the completion of 25 years of creditable service, the allowance shall be equal to one and eighty-two hundredths percent (1.82%) of the member’s
average final compensation, multiplied by the number of years of creditable service.

b.
If the member’s service retirement date occurs after the member’s 60th birthday and before the member’s 65th birthday and prior to the completion of 25 years or more of creditable
service, the retirement allowance shall be computed as in G.S. 135-5(b21)(2)a. but shall be reduced by one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the retirement date precedes
the first day of the month coincident with or next following the member’s 65th birthday.

c.
If the member’s early service retirement date occurs on or after the member’s 50th birthday and before the member’s 60th birthday and after completion of 20 years of creditable service
but prior to the completion of 30 years of creditable service, the early service retirement allowance shall be equal to the greater of the following amounts:

1.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b21)(2)a. but reduced by the sum of five-twelfths of one percent (5/12 of 1%) thereof for each month by which the member’s
retirement date precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the month the member would have attained his 60th birthday, plus one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) thereof for
each month by which the member’s 60th birthday precedes the first day of the month coincident with or next following the member’s 65th birthday.

2.
The service retirement allowance as computed under G.S. 135-5(b21)(2)a. reduced by five percent (5%) times the difference between 30 years and the amount of creditable service at retirement.

3.
If the member’s creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1994, the service retirement allowance equal to the actuarial equivalent of the allowance payable at the age of 60 years
as computed in G.S. 135-5(b21)(2)b.

d.
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall not receive less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(b).

Disability Retirement Benefits of Members Leaving Service Prior to January 1, 1988. — The provisions of this subsection shall not be applicable to members in service on or after January 1, 1988. Upon the application of a member or of his employer, any
member who has had five or more years of creditable service may be retired by the Board of Trustees, on the first day of any calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days next following the date of filing such application,
on a disability retirement allowance: Provided, that the medical board, after a medical examination of such member, shall certify that such member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the further performance of duty, that
such incapacity was incurred at the time of active employment and has been continuous thereafter, that such incapacity is likely to be permanent, and that such member should be retired; Provided further the medical board shall
determine if the member is able to engage in gainful employment and, if so, the member may still be retired and the disability retirement allowance as a result thereof shall be reduced as in subsection (e) below. Provided further,
that the medical board shall not certify any member as disabled who:

Applies for disability retirement based upon a mental or physical incapacity which existed when the member first established membership in the system; or

Is in receipt of any payments on account of the same disability which existed when the member first established membership in the system.The Board of Trustees shall require each employee upon enrolling in the retirement system to provide information on
the membership application concerning any mental or physical incapacities existing at the time the member enrolls.Supplemental disability benefits heretofore provided are hereby made a permanent part of disability benefits
after age 65, and shall not be discontinued at age 65.Notwithstanding the requirement of five or more years of creditable service to the contrary, a member who is a law-enforcement officer and who has had one year or more
of creditable service and becomes incapacitated for duty as the natural and proximate result of an accident occurring while in the actual performance of duty, and meets all other requirements for disability retirement benefits,
may be retired by the Board of Trustees on a disability retirement allowance.Notwithstanding the foregoing to the contrary, any beneficiary who commenced retirement with an early or service retirement benefit has the right,
within three years of his retirement, to convert to an allowance with disability retirement benefits without modification of any election of optional allowance previously made; provided, the beneficiary presents clear and
convincing evidence that the beneficiary would have met all applicable requirements for disability retirement benefits while still in service as a member. The allowance on account of disability retirement benefits to the
beneficiary shall be retroactive to the effective date of early or service retirement.Notwithstanding the foregoing, the surviving designated beneficiary of a deceased member who met all other requirements for disability
retirement benefits, except whose death occurred before the first day of the calendar month in which the member’s disability retirement allowance was to be due and payable, may elect to receive the reduced retirement allowance
provided by a one hundred percent (100%) joint and survivor payment option in lieu of a return of accumulated contributions, provided the following conditions apply:

(1)
At the time of the member’s death, one and only one beneficiary is eligible to receive a return of accumulated contributions, and

(2)
The member had not instructed the Board of Trustees in writing that he did not wish the provision of this subsection to apply.

Allowance on Disability Retirement of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1959, but prior to July 1, 1963. — Upon retirement for disability, in accordance with subsection (c) above, on or after July 1, 1959, but prior to July 1, 1963, a member shall
receive a service retirement allowance if he has attained the age of 60 years, otherwise he shall receive a disability retirement allowance which shall consist of:

An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his accumulated contributions at the time of retirement;

A pension equal to seventy-five per centum (75%) of the pension that would have been payable upon service retirement at the age of 65 years had the member continued in service to the age of 65 years without further change in compensation.If the member
has not less than 20 years of creditable service, he shall be entitled to a total retirement allowance of not less than seventy dollars ($70.00) per month; provided, that the computation shall be made prior to any reduction
resulting from an optional allowance as provided by subsection (g) of this section.

(d1)

Allowance on Disability Retirement of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1963, but prior to July 1, 1969. —
Upon retirement for disability, in accordance with subsection (c) above, on or after July 1, 1963, but prior to July 1, 1969, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance if he has attained the
age of 60 years, otherwise he shall receive a disability retirement allowance which shall be computed as follows:

(1)
Such allowance shall be equal to the service retirement allowance which would have been payable had he continued in service without further change in compensation, to the age of 60 years, minus the actuarial
equivalent to the contributions he would have made during such continued service.

(2)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(d).

(d2)

Allowance on Disability Retirement of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1969, but prior to July 1, 1971. —
Upon retirement for disability, in accordance with subsection (c) above, on or after July 1, 1969, but prior to July 1, 1971, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance if he has attained the
age of 60 years, otherwise he shall receive a disability retirement allowance which shall be computed as follows:

(1)
Such allowance shall be equal to the service retirement allowance which would have been payable had he continued in service without further change in compensation to the age of 65 years, minus the actuarial
equivalent of the contributions he would have made during such continued service.

(2)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1963, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(d).

(d3)

Allowance on Disability Retirement of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1971, but prior to July 1, 1982. —
Upon retirement for disability, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section on or after July 1, 1971, but prior to July 1, 1982, a member shall receive a service retirement allowance if he has attained
the age of 65 years; otherwise he shall receive a disability retirement allowance which shall be computed as follows:

(1)
Such allowance shall be equal to a service retirement allowance calculated on the basis of the member’s average final compensation prior to his disability retirement and the creditable service he would
have had at the age of 65 years if he had continued in service.

(2)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions,

Any member whose creditable service commenced prior to July 1, 1971, shall receive not less than the benefit provided by G.S. 135-5(d2);

The amount of disability allowance payable from the reserve funds of the Retirement System to any member retiring on or after July 1, 1974, who is eligible for and in receipt of a disability benefit under the Social Security Act shall be seventy percent
(70%) of the amount calculated under a above, and the balance shall be provided by the employer from time to time during each year in such amounts as may be required to cover such payments as current disbursements;
and

The amount of disability allowance payable to any member retiring on or after July 1, 1974, who is not eligible for and in receipt of a disability benefit under the Social Security Act shall not be payable from the reserve funds of the Retirement System
but shall be provided by the employer from time to time during each year in such amounts as may be required to cover such payments as current disbursements.

(d4)

Allowance on Disability Retirement of Persons Retiring on or after July 1, 1982, Who Left Service prior to January 1, 1988. —
Upon retirement for disability, in accordance with subsection (c) of this section on or after July 1, 1982, a member who left service prior to January 1, 1988 shall receive a service retirement
allowance if he has qualified for an unreduced service retirement allowance; otherwise the allowance shall be equal to a service retirement allowance calculated on the member’s average final compensation prior
to his disability retirement and the creditable service he would have had had he continued in service until the earliest date on which he would have qualified for an unreduced service retirement allowance.

Reexamination of Beneficiaries Retired for Disability. — The provisions of this subsection shall be applicable to members retired on a disability retirement allowance and shall not be applicable to members in service on or after January 1, 1988. Once
each year during the first five years following retirement of a member on a disability retirement allowance, and once in every three-year period thereafter, the Board of Trustees may, and upon his application shall, require any
disability beneficiary who has not yet attained the age of 60 years to undergo a medical examination, such examination to be made at the place of residence of said beneficiary or other place mutually agreed upon, by a physician
or physicians designated by the Board of Trustees. Should any disability beneficiary who has not yet attained the age of 60 years refuse to submit to at least one medical examination in any such year by a physician or physicians
designated by the Board of Trustees, his allowance may be discontinued until his withdrawal of such refusal, and should his refusal continue for one year all his rights in and to his pension may be revoked by the Board of Trustees.

The Board of Trustees shall determine whether a disability beneficiary is engaged in or is able to engage in a gainful occupation paying more than the difference, as hereinafter indexed, between his disability retirement allowance and the gross compensation
earned as an employee during the 12 consecutive months of service in the final 48 months prior to retirement producing the highest gross compensation excluding any compensation received on account of termination. If the
disability beneficiary is earning or is able to earn more than the difference, the portion of his disability retirement allowance not provided by his contributions shall be reduced to an amount which, together with the
portion of the disability retirement allowance provided by his contributions and the amount earnable by him shall equal the amount of his gross compensation prior to retirement. This difference shall be increased on January
1 each year by the percentage change between the December Consumer Price Index in the year prior to retirement and the December Consumer Price Index in the year most recently ended, calculated to the nearest tenth of one
percent (1/10 of 1%), provided that this percentage change is positive. Should the earning capacity of the disability beneficiary later change, the portion of his disability retirement allowance not provided by his contributions
may be further modified. In lieu of the reductions on account of a disability beneficiary earning more than the aforesaid difference, he may elect to convert his disability retirement allowance to a service retirement allowance
calculated on the basis of his average final compensation and creditable service at the time of disability and his age at the time of conversion to service retirement. This election is irrevocable. Provided, the provisions
of this subdivision shall not apply to beneficiaries of the Law-Enforcement Officers’ Retirement System transferred to this Retirement System who commenced retirement on and before July 1, 1981.

Should a disability beneficiary under the age of 60 years be restored to active service at a compensation not less than his average final compensation, his retirement allowance shall cease, he shall again become a member of the Retirement System, and
he shall contribute thereafter at the same rate he paid prior to disability; provided that, on and after July 1, 1971, if a disability beneficiary under the age of 62 years is restored to active service at a compensation
not less than his average final compensation, his retirement allowance shall cease, he shall again become a member of the Retirement System, and he shall contribute thereafter at the uniform contribution rate payable by
all members. Any such prior service certificate on the basis of which his service was computed at the time of his retirement shall be restored to full force and effect, and, in addition, upon his subsequent retirement he
shall be credited with all his service as a member, but should he be restored to active service on or after the attainment of the age of 50 years his pension upon subsequent retirement shall not exceed the sum of the pension
which he was receiving immediately prior to his last restoration and the pension that he would have received on account of his service since his last restoration had he entered service at the time as a new entrant.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a member retired on a disability retirement allowance who is restored to service and subsequently retires on or after July 1, 1971, shall be entitled to an allowance not less than the allowance described in a. below reduced
by the amount in b. below:

The allowance to which he would have been entitled if he were retiring for the first time, calculated on the basis of his total creditable service represented by the sum of his creditable service at the time of his first retirement and his creditable
service after he was restored to service.

The actuarial equivalent of the retirement benefits he previously received.

(3a)
Notwithstanding the foregoing, should a beneficiary who retired on a disability retirement allowance be restored to service as an employee or teacher, then the retirement allowance shall cease
as of the first day of the month following the month in which the beneficiary is restored to service and the beneficiary shall become a member of the Retirement System and shall contribute thereafter as allowed
by law at the uniform contribution payable by all members. Upon the subsequent retirement of the beneficiary, he shall be entitled to an allowance to which he would have been entitled if he were retiring for